Hawaii statutes.
§187A-12 University of Hawaii may use land,
etc. The University of Hawaii shall have the privilege, free of charge, of
using the land, buildings, apparatus, and appliances of the department for the
purposes of a biological laboratory and for research and investigation in
connection therewith, so far as the same can be done without material
interference with the use of the same as an aquatic life propagation station or
for other aquatic-resources activities. The university shall render to the
department, in return therefor, such assistance as is reasonably practicable,
in connection with the aquatic life propagation station or for other
aquatic-resources activities, and as may be mutually agreed upon. [L 1985, c
94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next